Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-11,157
State Department of Education; duties.

The State Department of Education shall develop and distribute a technical assistance document for dyslexia. The technical assistance document shall provide information about the characteristics of dyslexia, associated conditions of dyslexia, indicators of dyslexia, and the screening, progress monitoring, evaluation, instruction, and intervention for dyslexia. The technical assistance document shall also provide guidance for evidence-based structured literacy instruction to be implemented with fidelity using a multisensory approach for students who are identified as exhibiting characteristics of dyslexia. Such document shall be distributed to all teacher education programs, educational service units, and school districts to create statewide awareness among educators. The document shall also be referenced in the rules and regulations of the department regarding approval of teacher education programs, special education, and accreditation of schools.

Laws 2018, LB1052, § 2.